Utah statutes.
17-18a-703.   Dissolution of prosecution district.

(1)  A county legislative body of a prosecution district described in Section 17-18a-701, or the legislative bodies of multiple counties within a multicounty prosecution district described in Section 17-18a-702, may not dissolve the prosecution district or multicounty prosecution district, respectively, during the term of office of an elected or appointed district attorney.

(2)  Each county legislative body shall ensure that an ordinance dissolving a prosecution district within a single county or an interlocal agreement dissolving a prosecution district within multiple counties:

(a)  is enacted before February 1 of the year in which the regular general election, as defined in Section 20A-1-102, is held to elect an attorney; and

(b)  takes effect on the first Monday in January after the year in which the attorney is elected.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

